Utah statutes.
78B-7-310.   Transitional provision.

This part applies to protection orders issued before July 1, 2006 and to continuing actions for enforcement of foreign protection orders commenced before July 1, 2006.  A request for enforcement of a foreign protection order made on or after July 1, 2006 for violations of a foreign protection order occurring before July 1, 2006 is governed by this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

